Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.210

Estimates of service, compensation, or age.

If it shall be impracticable for the board of administration to determine from the records the length of service, the compensation, or the age of any member, the said board may estimate for the purpose of this chapter, such length of service, compensation or age.

[ 1939 c 207 s 22; RRS s 9592-122.]